Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1549
Amercement; motion; notice; effect of entry; transmission of money.

No sheriff shall forward by mail any money made on any such execution, unless he shall be specially instructed to do it by the plaintiff, his agent or attorney of record. In all cases of a motion to amerce a sheriff or other officer of any county other than the one from which the execution issued, notice in writing shall be given to such officer, as hereinbefore required, by leaving it with him, or at his office, at least fifteen days before the first day of the term at which such motion shall be made, or by transmitting the notice by mail at least sixty days prior to the first day of the term at which such motion shall be made. All amercements, so procured, shall be entered on the record of the court, and shall have the same force and effect as a judgment.

R.S.1867, Code § 517, p. 483;

R.S.1913, § 8096;

C.S.1922, § 9032;

C.S.1929, § 20-1550;

R.S.1943, § 25-1549.